Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5020
County assessor or deputy assessor; invalidation or suspension of certificate; appeal.

The commission, subject to rules and regulations, shall have the power to invalidate or suspend the certificate issued pursuant to section 77-422 of any county assessor or deputy assessor who willfully fails or refuses to comply with any order of the commission. No certificate shall be invalidated or suspended except upon a hearing before the commission.

Any county assessor or deputy assessor whose certificate has been so invalidated or suspended may appeal the decision to the Court of Appeals in accordance with section 77-5019.

No action shall be brought under this section more than two years after the date of the act, last date of a series of actions complained of, or the last date the county assessor or deputy assessor could have acted to comply, whichever is later.

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 20;

Laws 2004, LB 973, § 62;

Laws 2007, LB167, § 8.